Nebraska, session 109, LB2.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections
19-5601, 19-5602, 19-5603, 19-5604, 19-5605, 19-5606, 19-5607, 19-5608, 28-463,
28-464, 28-465, 28-466, 28-467, 28-468, 28-469, 50-435, 81-1213, and
81-1429.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and section 43-1306, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024.
-1-